Missouri, session 2026, SB1554.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 640.144, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 640.144,
to read as follows:
640.144. 1. All community water systems shall be
required to create a valve inspection program that includes:
(1) Inspection of all valves every ten years;
(2) Scheduled repair or replacement of broken valves;
and
(3) Within five years of August 28, 2020,
identification of each shut-off valve location using a
geographic information system or an alternative physical
mapping system that accurately identifies the location of
each valve.
2. All community water systems shall be required to
create a hydrant inspection program that includes:
(1) Scheduled testing of every hydrant in the
community water system;
(2) Scheduled repair or replacement of broken hydrants;
(3) A plan to flush every hydrant and dead-end main;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1554 2
(4) Maintenance of records of inspections, tests, and
flushings for six years; and
(5) Within five years of August 28, 2020,
identification of each hydrant location using a geographic
information system or an alternative physical mapping system
that accurately identifies the location of each hydrant.
3. The provisions of this section shall not apply to
any state parks, cities with a population of more than
thirty thousand inhabitants, [a] any county with a charter
form of government and with more than six hundred thousand
but fewer than seven hundred thousand inhabitants, [a] any
county with a charter form of government and with more than
nine hundred fifty thousand inhabitants, or [a] any public
service commission regulated utility with more than thirty
thousand customers.
✓